Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. Community Mental Health Services Act.

Administrative Code. —

For community mental health services, see 7 AAC 71.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Community mental health grantees who receive funds from the Department of Health and Social Services through the Division of Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities are required to report to the department and DMHDD all income they receive, including Medicaid, insurance claims, cash, and any other third-party payments. Grantees are required to disclose all funding sources, apart from the grant awarded by the department, if the income is earned by the grant project. Insurance reimbursements are encompassed in the definition of grant income. 1999 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

This statutory framework allows the state to provide the support needed for communities to establish community mental health centers. However, the framework also clearly envisions a system whereby community mental health centers seek funding from other sources to augment funding received from the Department of Health and Social Services through a grant. Grants from the department are not a sole source of funding for any grantee. 1999 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Sec. 47.30.520.
Legislative purpose.

It is the purpose of the Community Mental Health Services Act to

provide a range of community-based inpatient, outpatient, and support services for persons with mental disorders;

assist communities in planning, organizing, and financing community mental health services through locally developed, administered, and controlled community mental health programs;

better develop and use resources at both state and local levels;

develop and implement plans for comprehensive mental health services based on demonstrated need on a regional basis;

improve the effectiveness of existing mental health services;

integrate state-operated and community mental health programs into a unified mental health system;

ensure that consumers, families, and representatives of communities within mental health planning regions can participate in planning for, determining the need for, and allocating mental health resources;

provide a means of allocating money available for state mental health services according to community needs;

encourage the full use of all existing public or private agencies, facilities, personnel, and funds to accomplish these objectives; and

prevent unnecessary duplication and fragmentation of services and expenditures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1987; am § 28 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 30 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For contracts for services, see 7 AAC 71, art. 2.

Sec. 47.30.523.
Community mental health program policy and principles.

It is the policy of the state that

the community mental health program provide a comprehensive and integrated system of community-based facilities, supports, and mental health services, including child and adolescent screening and diagnosis, inpatient, outpatient, prevention, consultation, and education services;

persons most in need of community mental health services receive appropriate services as provided under AS

47.30.056

;

the community mental health program be coordinated, to the maximum extent possible, with the programs established under AS 47.37, AS 47.65, AS 47.80, and other programs affecting the well being of persons in need of mental health services.

Community mental health program service delivery principles include the principles that persons

have ready and prompt access to necessary screening, diagnosis, and treatment;

receiving community mental health services be informed of their rights, including their rights to confidentiality and to treatment with dignity;

be provided community mental health services by staff and programs that reflect the culture, linguistic, and other social characteristics of their community and that incorporate multidisciplinary professional staff to meet client functional levels and diagnostic and treatment needs;

in need of community mental health services, and their families, be encouraged to participate in formulating, delivering, and evaluating treatment and rehabilitation;

in need of community mental health services be provided treatment and rehabilitation services designed to minimize institutionalization and maximize individual potential;

be treated in the least restrictive alternative environment consistent with their treatment needs, enabling the person to live as normally as possible;

be provided necessary treatment as close to the person’s home as possible;

be informed of and allowed to participate in planning their own treatment as much as possible.

History.

(§ 29 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.530.
Duties of department.

The department shall administer the provisions of AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

and shall

define and develop standards for various levels and qualities of mental health care;

provide fiscal and professional technical assistance in planning, organizing, developing, implementing, and administering local mental health services;

develop budgets and receive and distribute state appropriations and funds in accordance with the provisions of AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

;

establish standards of education and experience for professional, technical, and administrative personnel employed in community mental health services;

assist the community in establishing the organization and operation of community mental health services;

develop a standardized system for measuring and reporting to the department the types, quantities, and quality of services; and develop a cost accounting system that will demonstrate the cost of various levels and qualities of care;

provide each local community planning and services delivery entity with statistics, reports, and other data relevant to development of indices indicating the need for mental health services, or relevant to evaluating the effectiveness of existing services;

review each local community plan and require each plan to include

an affirmative showing that the most effective and economic use will be made of all available public and private resources in the community including careful consideration of the most effective and economic alternative forms and patterns of services;

a five-year projection of needs, services, and resources; and

adequate provisions for review and evaluation of services provided in the local community;

adopt regulations and establish priorities, after consultation with local communities affected and in conjunction with the Alaska Mental Health Board, that are necessary to carry out the purposes of AS 47.30.520 — 47.30.620.

In performing its duties under (a) of this section, the department shall coordinate with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority established in AS

47.30.011

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am § 30 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 31 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For scope, see 7 AAC 71, art. 1.

For contracts for services, see 7 AAC 71, art. 2.

For standards for operation of a community mental health center, see 7 AAC 71, art. 3.

For client rights, see 7 AAC 71, art. 4.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Sec. 47.30.540.
Local community entities.

A city or borough government or other political subdivision of the state, a nonprofit corporation, or a combination of these, is eligible to receive funds and administer local programs under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

. In order to ensure equitable access to funds and programs through the state, the department shall determine appropriate geographical areas to be served by local programs in consultation with representatives of the geographical areas in question.

An entity designated by the department to receive money under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

shall ensure a broad base of community support as evidenced by a governing board reasonably representative of the professional, civic, and citizen groups in the community and including persons with mental disorders or family members of persons with mental disorders. No more than two members, or 40 percent of the membership, whichever is greater, may be providers of services under the program. In order to receive money under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

, a local community entity shall agree

to give priority to mental health programs and services consistent with the priorities set out in AS

47.30.056

and that provide the maximum services for the least expenditure of money from the mental health trust settlement income account;

to furnish services through a qualified staff meeting reasonable standards of experience and training;

to conform to a state cost accounting system showing the true cost of services rendered, collect fees for services according to a schedule based on an analysis of reasonable ability to pay, and provide that a person may not be refused services because of inability to pay for those services;

to maintain adequate clinical and administrative records and furnish periodic reports to the department;

to furnish the authority and the department an annual report of the preceding fiscal year, including an evaluation of the effectiveness of the previous year’s programs and their costs;

to furnish the authority and the department satisfactory needs assessments for the population and area it serves and an annual update of a long-range planning and budget statement that describes program goals for the coming year, the steps and resources necessary to implement the goals, the projected means by which these resources will be secured, and the procedures necessary to evaluate the program;

to furnish the department with confidential and other information about recipients of services paid for, in whole or part, under AS 47.30.520 — 47.30.620 and comply with regulations of the department regarding the submission of this information; and

to notify the department immediately of emergency situations involving recipients of services paid for, in whole or in part, under AS 47.30.520 — 47.30.620 and comply with regulations of the department regarding this notification; for purposes of this paragraph, “emergency situations” include the disappearance, injury, or death of a recipient.

Members of local governing boards may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses incurred in the organization and operation of local programs as may be determined by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am § 31 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (b)(1) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Administrative Code. —

For scope, see 7 AAC 71, art. 1.

For contracts for services, see 7 AAC 71, art. 2.

For standards for operation of a community mental health center, see 7 AAC 71, art. 3.

For client rights, see 7 AAC 71, art. 4.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Sec. 47.30.545.
Populations to be served.

The entities designated by the department to receive money under AS

47.30.540(b)

shall provide one or more of the services that are set out in AS

47.30.056(i)

to persons identified in AS

47.30.056

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 47 SLA 1987; am § 32 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.546.
Services for mentally and emotionally disturbed. [Repealed, § 49 ch 66 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 47.30.547.
Standards for community mental health services.

An entity that provides community mental health services shall

make services available at times and locations that enable residents of the entity’s service area to obtain services readily;

ensure each client’s right to confidentiality and treatment with dignity;

establish staffing patterns of qualified and trained personnel that reflect the cultural, linguistic, and other social characteristics of the community and that incorporate multidisciplinary professional staff to meet client functional levels and diagnostic and treatment needs;

promote client and family participation in formulating, delivering, and evaluating treatment and rehabilitation;

design screening, diagnosis, treatment, and rehabilitation services to maximize individual potential and to minimize institutionalization; and

provide services in the least restrictive setting, enabling the person receiving the services to live as normally as possible.

History.

(§ 2 ch 47 SLA 1987; am § 33 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.550.
Cost sharing formulas; use of income.

In a district designated by the department as a poverty area, the department may fund not more than 90 percent of the eligible costs of the community mental health services to be furnished under an entity’s approved plan.

In a district that has not been designated by the department as a poverty area, the department may fund not more than 75 percent of the eligible costs of the community mental health services to be furnished under an entity’s approved plan.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, if the department determines that sufficient funds from other sources are unavailable, then the department shall fund the percent of the eligible costs that is necessary in order to ensure that services for chronically mentally ill adults and severely mentally ill children, and other community mental health services to be furnished under an entity’s approved plan are made available by the entity. Funding under this subsection is subject to the availability of legislative appropriations for the purpose.

Income earned by an entity through a community mental health project funded under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

shall be used to augment or enhance the entity’s mental health services.

In (a) and (b) of this section, “poverty area” means a census district in which at least 15 percent of the population, based upon the most recent census data, falls under 125 percent of the United States Department of Health and Human Services’ Poverty Income Guidelines for Alaska, as reported in the Federal Register.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1991; am § 32 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 55 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see https://aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Administrative Code. —

For contracts for services, see 7 AAC 71, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “data” for “date” in subsection (e).

Sec. 47.30.560.
Contracts and expenditures.

The contracts for services provided for in AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

shall be reviewed, revised if necessary, and approved at the expiration of each contract year.
A contract shall be approved if the department finds that the community entity has complied with its plan, AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

, and any applicable regulations adopted by the department. Expenditures for the purchase of services shall be made in accordance with the approved contract, budgets, and program projections.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For contracts for services, see 7 AAC 71, art. 2.

Sec. 47.30.570.
Regulations; eligible services and costs.

The department shall adopt regulations specifying the types of services and program costs eligible for state participation. These regulations must include

a provision excluding capital expenditures as eligible costs; and

a requirement that the community entity contractor or applicant agrees as a condition of contract approval that it will not supplant existing local fund support of community mental health services with funds received under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

and that it will continue local funding support of community mental health services, in any year in which it contracts with the department, at a level that is at least equal to the local funding support in the previous year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For contracts for services, see 7 AAC 71, art. 2.

Sec. 47.30.580.
Comprehensive services.

Plans and regulations adopted under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

must allow local programs sufficient administrative and program flexibility so that local community mental health programs may be joined with other programs such as intellectual and developmental disability programs, drug abuse programs, alcoholism programs, and comprehensive mental health services programs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am § 24 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, substituted “intellectual and developmental disability” for “mental retardation”.

Sec. 47.30.590.
Patient rights and the confidential nature of records and information.

The department shall adopt regulations to assure patient rights and to safeguard the confidential nature of records and information about the recipients of services provided under this chapter. The regulations must require that entities identified in AS

47.30.540(b)

develop and include in any plan submitted for approval adequate provisions for safeguarding confidential information. The regulations must provide for disclosure of confidential information to parents or guardians, to mental health professionals providing services to a recipient, and to other appropriate service agencies when it is in the defined best interests of the patient.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department is authorized to review, obtain, and copy confidential and other records and information about the clients of services requested or furnished under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

to evaluate compliance with those statutes. The department may obtain the records and information regarding clients from the client or directly from an entity designated by the department under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

that furnished those services. Records obtained by the department under this subsection are medical records, shall be handled confidentially, and are exempt from public inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am § 34 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For client rights, see 7 AAC 71, art. 4.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Sec. 47.30.600.
Applicability to existing programs. [Repealed, § 6 ch 47 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 47.30.605.
Mental Health Advisory Council. [Repealed, § 13 ch 48 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 47.30.610.
Definitions.

In AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.610

,

“authority” means the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority established in AS

47.30.011

;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“persons with mental disorders” means persons with disorders currently included within nationally accepted diagnostic systems of the mental health professions;

“trust” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.061

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975; am §§ 4, 5 ch 47 SLA 1987; am § 35 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.620.
Short title.

AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

may be cited as the Community Mental Health Services Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1975)